Ohio, session 136, HB925.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO: Section 1. That sections 149.311 and 175.16 of the Revised Code be amended to read as follows: Sec. 149.311. (A) As used in this section: (1) "Historic building" means a building, including its structural components, that is located in this state and that is either individually listed on the national register of historic places under 16 U.S.C. 470a, located in a registered historic district, and certified by the state historic preservation officer as being of historic significance to the district, or is individually listed as an historic landmark designated by a local government certified under 16 U.S.C. 470a(c). (2) "Qualified rehabilitation expenditures" means expenditures paid or incurred during the rehabilitation period, and before and after that period as determined under 26 U.S.C. 47, by an owner or qualified lessee of an historic building to rehabilitate the building. "Qualified rehabilitation expenditures" includes architectural or engineering fees paid or incurred in connection with the rehabilitation, and expenses incurred in the preparation of nomination forms for listing on the national register of historic places. "Qualified rehabilitation expenditures" does not include any of the following: (a) The cost of acquiring, expanding, or enlarging an historic building; (b) Expenditures attributable to work done to facilities related to the building, such as parking lots, sidewalks, and landscaping; (c) New building construction costs. (3) "Owner" of an historic building means a person holding the fee simple interest in the building. "Owner" does not include the state or a state agency, or any political subdivision as defined in section 9.23 of the Revised Code. (4) "Qualified lessee" means a person subject to a lease agreement for an historic building and eligible for the federal rehabilitation tax credit under 26 U.S.C. 47. "Qualified lessee" does not include the state or a state agency or political subdivision as defined in section 9.23 of the Revised Code. (5) "Certificate owner" means the owner or qualified lessee of an historic building to which a rehabilitation tax credit certificate was issued under this section. (6) "Registered historic district" means an historic district listed in the national register of historic places under 16 U.S.C. 470a, an historic district designated by a local government certified under 16 U.S.C. 470a(c), or a local historic district certified under 36 C.F.R. 67.8 and 67.9. (7) "Rehabilitation" means the process of repairing or altering an historic building or buildings, making possible an efficient use while preserving those portions and features of the building and its site and environment that are significant to its historic, architectural, and cultural values. (8) "Rehabilitation period" means one of the following: (a) If the rehabilitation initially was not planned to be completed in stages, a period chosen by the owner or qualified lessee not to exceed twenty-four months during which rehabilitation occurs; (b) If the rehabilitation initially was planned to be completed in stages, a period chosen by the owner or qualified lessee not to exceed sixty months during which rehabilitation occurs. Each stage shall be reviewed as a phase of a rehabilitation as determined under 26 C.F.R. 1.48-12 or a successor to that section. (9) "State historic preservation officer" or "officer" means the state historic preservation officer appointed by the governor under 16 U.S.C. 470a. (10) "Catalytic project" means the rehabilitation of an historic building, the rehabilitation of which will foster economic development within two thousand five hundred feet of the historic building. (B) The owner or qualified lessee of an historic building may apply to the director of development for a rehabilitation tax credit certificate for qualified rehabilitation expenditures paid or incurred by such owner or qualified lessee after April 4, 2007, for rehabilitation of an historic building. If the owner of an historic building enters a pass-through agreement with a qualified lessee for the purposes of the federal rehabilitation tax credit under 26 U.S.C. 47, the qualified rehabilitation expenditures paid or incurred by the owner after April 4, 2007, may be attributed to the qualified lessee. The form and manner of filing such applications shall be prescribed by rule of the director. Each application shall state the amount of qualified rehabilitation expenditures the applicant estimates will be paid or incurred and shall indicate whether the historic building was used as a theater before, and is intended to be used as a theater after, the rehabilitation. The director may require applicants to furnish documentation of such estimates. The director, after consultation with the tax commissioner and in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code, shall adopt rules that establish all of the following: (1) Forms and procedures by which applicants may apply for rehabilitation tax credit certificates; (2) Criteria for reviewing, evaluating, and approving applications for certificates within the limitations under division (D) of this section, criteria for assuring that the certificates issued encompass a mixture of high and low qualified rehabilitation expenditures, and criteria for issuing certificates under division (C)(3)(b) of this section; (3) Eligibility requirements for obtaining a certificate under this section; (4) The form of rehabilitation tax credit certificates; (5) Reporting requirements and monitoring procedures; (6) Procedures and criteria for conducting cost-benefit analyses of historic buildings that are the subjects of applications filed under this section. The purpose of a cost-benefit analysis shall be to determine whether rehabilitation of the historic building will result in a net revenue gain in state and local taxes once the building is used. (7) Any other rules necessary to implement and administer this section. (C) The director shall review the applications with the assistance of the state historic preservation officer and determine whether all of the following criteria are met: (1) That the building that is the subject of the application is an historic building and the applicant is the owner or qualified lessee of the building; (2) That the rehabilitation will satisfy standards prescribed by the United States secretary of the interior under 16 U.S.C. 470, et seq., as amended, and 36 C.F.R. 67.7 or a successor to that section; (3) That receiving a rehabilitation tax credit certificate under this section is a major factor in: (a) The applicant's decision to rehabilitate the historic building; or (b) To increase the level of investment in such rehabilitation. (4) The If the applicant is not an area agency on aging, as defined in section 173.14 of the Revised Code, the historic building that is the subject of the application is not, and will not upon completion of the rehabilitation project be, part of a qualified low-income housing project allocated a tax credit pursuant to section 42 of the Internal Revenue Code. An applicant shall demonstrate to the satisfaction of the state historic preservation officer and director that the rehabilitation will satisfy the standards described in division (C)(2) of this section before the applicant begins the physical rehabilitation of the historic building. (D)(1) If the director determines that an application meets the criteria in division (C) of this section, the director shall conduct a cost-benefit analysis for the historic building that is the subject of the application to determine whether rehabilitation of the historic building will result in a net revenue gain in state and local taxes once the building is used. The director shall consider the results of the cost-benefit analysis in determining whether to approve the application. The director shall also consider the potential economic impact and the regional distributive balance of the credits throughout the state. The director shall not consider whether the historic building is located in or will benefit an economically distressed area, including by weighting preference based on the poverty rate in the jurisdiction or census tract in which the building is located, nor shall the director consider or give weighted preference based on vacancy or underutilization of the building. The director may approve an application only after completion of the cost-benefit analysis. (2) A rehabilitation tax credit certificate shall not be issued for an amount greater than the estimated amount furnished by the applicant on the application for such certificate and approved by the director. The director shall not approve more than a total of seventy-five million dollars of rehabilitation tax credits for each of fiscal years 2023 and 2024, and for each fiscal year thereafter, but the director may reallocate unused tax credits from a prior fiscal year for new applicants and such reallocated credits shall not apply toward the dollar limit of this division. (3) For rehabilitations with a rehabilitation period not exceeding twenty-four months as provided in division (A)(8)(a) of this section, a rehabilitation tax credit certificate shall not be issued before the rehabilitation of the historic building is completed. (4) For rehabilitations with a rehabilitation period not exceeding sixty months as provided in division (A)(8)(b) of this section, a rehabilitation tax credit certificate shall not be issued before a stage of rehabilitation is completed. After all stages of rehabilitation are completed, if the director cannot determine that the criteria in division (C) of this section are satisfied for all stages of rehabilitations, the director shall certify this finding to the tax commissioner, and any rehabilitation tax credits received by the applicant shall be repaid by the applicant and may be collected by assessment as unpaid tax by the commissioner. (5) The director shall require the applicant to provide a third-party cost certification by a certified public accountant of the actual costs attributed to the rehabilitation of the historic building when qualified rehabilitation expenditures exceed two hundred thousand dollars. If an applicant whose application is approved for receipt of a rehabilitation tax credit certificate fails to provide to the director sufficient evidence of reviewable progress, including a viable financial plan, copies of final construction drawings, and evidence that the applicant has obtained all historic approvals within twelve months after the date the applicant received notification of approval, and if the applicant fails to provide evidence to the director that the applicant has secured and closed on financing for the rehabilitation within eighteen months after receiving notification of approval, the director may rescind the approval of the application. The director shall notify the applicant if the approval has been rescinded. Credits that would have been available to an applicant whose approval was rescinded shall be available for other qualified applicants. Nothing in this division prohibits an applicant whose approval has been rescinded from submitting a new application for a rehabilitation tax credit certificate. (6) The director may approve the application of, and issue a rehabilitation tax credit certificate to, the owner of a catalytic project, provided the application otherwise meets the criteria described in divisions (C) and (D) of this section. The director may not approve more than one application for a rehabilitation tax credit certificate under division (D)(6) of this section during each state fiscal biennium. The director shall not approve an application for a rehabilitation tax credit certificate under division (D)(6) of this section during the state fiscal biennium beginning July 1, 2017, or during any state fiscal biennium thereafter. The director shall consider the following criteria in determining whether to approve an application for a certificate under division (D)(6) of this section: (a) Whether the historic building is a catalytic project; (b) The effect issuance of the certificate would have on the availability of credits for other applicants that qualify for a credit certificate within the credit dollar limit described in division (D)(2) of this section; (c) The number of jobs, if any, the catalytic project will create. (7)(a) The owner or qualified lessee of a historic building may apply for a rehabilitation tax credit certificate under both divisions (B) and (D)(6) of this section. In such a case, the director shall consider each application at the time the application is submitted. (b) The director shall not issue more than one certificate under this section with respect to the same qualified rehabilitation expenditures. (8) The director shall give consideration for tax credits awarded under this section to rehabilitations of historic buildings used as a theater before, and intended to be used as a theater after, the rehabilitation. In determining whether to approve an application for such a rehabilitation, the director shall consider the extent to which the rehabilitation will increase attendance at the theater and increase the theater's gross revenue. (9) The director shall rescind the approval of any application, other than an application from an area agency on aging as defined in section 173.14 of the Revised Code, if the building that is the subject of the application is part of a qualified low-income housing project allocated a tax credit pursuant to section 42 of the Internal Revenue Code at any time before the building's rehabilitation is complete. (E) Issuance of a certificate represents a finding by the director of the matters described in divisions (C)(1), (2), and (3) of this section only; issuance of a certificate does not represent a verification or certification by the director of the amount of qualified rehabilitation expenditures for which a tax credit may be claimed under section 5725.151, 5725.34, 5726.52, 5729.17, 5733.47, or 5747.76 of the Revised Code. The amount of qualified rehabilitation expenditures for which a tax credit may be claimed is subject to inspection and examination by the tax commissioner or employees of the commissioner under section 5703.19 of the Revised Code and any other applicable law. Upon the issuance of a certificate, the director shall certify to the tax commissioner, in the form and manner requested by the tax commissioner, the name of the applicant, the amount of qualified rehabilitation expenditures shown on the certificate, and any other information required by the rules adopted under this section. (F)(1) On or before the first day of August each year, the director and tax commissioner jointly shall submit to the president of the senate and the speaker of the house of representatives a report on the tax credit program established under this section and sections 5725.151, 5725.34, 5726.52, 5729.17, 5733.47, and 5747.76 of the Revised Code. The report shall present an overview of the program and shall include information on the number of rehabilitation tax credit certificates issued under this section during the preceding fiscal year, an update on the status of each historic building for which an application was approved under this section, the dollar amount of the tax credits granted under sections 5725.151, 5725.34, 5726.52, 5729.17, 5733.47, and 5747.76 of the Revised Code, and any other information the director and commissioner consider relevant to the topics addressed in the report. (2) On or before December 1, 2015, the director and tax commissioner jointly shall submit to the president of the senate and the speaker of the house of representatives a comprehensive report that includes the information required by division (F)(1) of this section and a detailed analysis of the effectiveness of issuing tax credits for rehabilitating historic buildings. The report shall be prepared with the assistance of an economic research organization jointly chosen by the director and commissioner. (G) There is hereby created in the state treasury the historic rehabilitation tax credit operating fund. The director is authorized to charge reasonable application and other fees in connection with the administration of tax credits authorized by this section and sections 5725.151, 5725.34, 5726.52, 5729.17, 5733.47, and 5747.76 of the Revised Code. Any such fees collected shall be credited to the fund and used to pay reasonable costs incurred by the department of development in administering this section and sections 5725.151, 5725.34, 5726.52, 5729.17, 5733.47, and 5747.76 of the Revised Code. The Ohio historic preservation office is authorized to charge reasonable fees in connection with its review and approval of applications under this section. Any such fees collected shall be credited to the fund and used to pay administrative costs incurred by the Ohio historic preservation office pursuant to this section. (H) Notwithstanding sections 5725.151, 5725.34, 5726.52, 5729.17, 5733.47, and 5747.76 of the Revised Code, the certificate owner of a tax credit certificate issued under division (D)(6) of this section may claim a tax credit equal to twenty-five per cent of the dollar amount indicated on the certificate for a total credit of not more than twenty-five million dollars. The credit claimed by such a certificate owner for any calendar year, tax year, or taxable year under section 5725.151, 5725.34, 5726.52, 5729.17, 5733.47, or 5747.76 of the Revised Code shall not exceed five million dollars. If the certificate owner is eligible for more than five million dollars in total credits, the certificate owner may carry forward the balance of the credit in excess of the amount claimed for that year for not more than five ensuing calendar years, tax years, or taxable years. If the credit claimed in any calendar year, tax year, or taxable year exceeds the tax otherwise due, the excess shall be refunded to the taxpayer. (I) Notwithstanding sections 5725.151, 5725.34, 5726.52, 5729.17, 5733.47, and 5747.76 of the Revised Code, the following apply to a tax credit approved under this section after September 13, 2022, and before July 1, 2024: (1) The certificate holder may claim a tax credit equal to thirty-five per cent of the dollar amount indicated on the tax credit certificate if any county, township, or municipal corporation within which the project is located has a population of less than three hundred thousand according to the 2020 decennial census. The tax credit equals twenty-five per cent of the dollar amount indicated on the certificate if the project is not located within such a county, township, or municipal corporation. (2) The total tax credit claimed under section 5725.151, 5725.34, 5726.52, 5729.17, 5733.47, or 5747.76 of the Revised Code for any one project shall not exceed ten million dollars for any calendar year, tax year, or taxable year. (3) If the credit claimed in any calendar year, tax year, or taxable year exceeds the tax otherwise due, the excess shall be refunded to the taxpayer, subject to division (I)(2) of this section. (J) Notwithstanding sections 5725.151, 5725.34, 5726.52, 5729.17, 5733.47, and 5747.76 of the Revised Code, the certificate owner of a tax credit certificate may claim a tax credit equal to thirty-five per cent of the dollar amount of qualified rehabilitation expenditures indicated on the certificate if the project for which the certificate was issued is located in a municipal corporation with a population of less than three hundred thousand or in the unincorporated area of a township. (K) The director of development, in consultation with the director of budget and management, shall develop and adopt a system of tracking any information necessary to anticipate the impact of credits issued under this section on tax revenues for current and future fiscal years. Such information may include the number of applications approved, the estimated rehabilitation expenditures and rehabilitation period associated with such applications, the number and amount of tax credit certificates issued, and any other information the director of budget and management requires for the purposes of this division. (L) For purposes of this section and Chapter 122:19-1 of the Ohio Administrative Code, a tax credit certificate issued under this section is effective on the date that all historic buildings rehabilitated by the project are "placed in service," as that term is used in section 47 of the Internal Revenue Code. Sec. 175.16. (A) As used in this section: (1) "Federal credit" means the tax credit authorized under section 42 of the Internal Revenue Code. (2) "Credit period," "qualified low-income building," and "qualified basis" have the same meanings as in section 42 of the Internal Revenue Code. (3) "Qualified project" means a qualified low-income building that is located in Ohio, is placed in service on or after July 1, 2023, and for which the director reserves a tax credit under division (B) of this section before July 1, 2027. (4) "Pass-through entity" has the same meaning as in section 5733.04 of the Revised Code. (5) "Project owner" means a person holding a fee simple interest or a leasehold interest pursuant to a ground lease in the land on which a qualified project sits. (6) "Reserved credit amount" means the amount determined by the director and stipulated in the notice sent to each owner of a qualified project under division (B) of this section. (7) "Annual credit amount" means the amount computed by the director under division (D) of this section prior to issuing an eligibility certificate. (8) "Equity owner" means a direct or indirect owner of a project owner, provided the project owner is a pass-through entity, as determined under applicable state law governing such an entity. (9) "Person" has the same meaning as in section 5701.01 of the Revised Code. (10) "Eligibility certificate" means a certificate issued by the director to each owner of a qualified project under division (D) of this section stating the amount of credit that may be claimed for each year of the credit period. (11) "Qualified allocation plan" means the plan developed by the Ohio housing finance agency, as required under section 175.06 of the Revised Code, for evaluating and selecting projects for the federal credit pursuant to the mandates and requirements within section 42 of the Internal Revenue Code. (12) "Internal Revenue Code" has the same meaning as in section 5747.01 of the Revised Code. (13) "Designated reporter" means the project owner or one of the project owner's equity owners designated pursuant to division (I)(1) of this section. (14) "Director" means the executive director of the Ohio housing finance agency. (B) Except as otherwise provided by this division, the director, upon allocating a federal credit and issuing a binding reservation or letter of eligibility, pursuant to the Ohio housing finance agency's qualified allocation plan, for a qualified low-income building that is located in this state and placed in service on or after July 1, 2023, may reserve a tax credit under this section for the project owners so long as doing so will not result in exceeding the annual credit cap prescribed by division (C) of this section. The director shall not reserve a tax credit under this section after June 30, 2027. The director shall send written notice of the reservation to each project owner. The notice shall state the aggregate credit amount reserved for all years of the qualified project's credit period and stipulate that receipt of the credit is contingent upon issuance of an eligibility certificate and filing the information described in division (I) of this section. Upon receipt of that notice, the owner shall provide the identity of the owner's designated reporter to the director. The director shall determine the credit amount reserved for each qualified project. The reserved credit amount shall not exceed the amount necessary, when combined with the federal credit, to ensure the financial feasibility of the qualified project. The director shall reserve credits in a manner that ensures that a qualified project is creating additional housing units that would not have otherwise been created with other state, federal, or private financing. The director may assess application, processing, and reporting fees to cover the cost of administering the tax credit authorized under this section. (C) The aggregate amount of credits reserved by the director under division (B) of this section in a fiscal year shall not exceed the sum of (1) one hundred million dollars, (2) the amount, if any, by which the credit cap prescribed by this division for the preceding fiscal year exceeds the credits reserved by the director in that year, and (3) the amount of tax credits recaptured or otherwise disallowed under division (G) of this section in the preceding fiscal year. For the purpose of computing and determining compliance with the credit cap prescribed by this division, the credit amount reserved for the project owners of a qualified project is the full amount for all years of the qualified project's credit period. (D) Immediately after approving the final cost certification for a qualified project for which a tax credit under this section is reserved, or upon otherwise determining the qualified basis of the qualified project and the date it was placed into service as required by section 42(m) of the Internal Revenue Code, the director shall compute the annual credit amount and issue an eligibility certificate to each project owner. The director shall send copies of all eligibility certificates issued each calendar year to the tax commissioner and the superintendent of insurance. The annual credit amount shall equal the lesser of the following: (1) The amount of the federal credit that would be awarded to the project owners for the first year of the credit period if not for the adjustment required under section 42(f)(2) of the Internal Revenue Code; (2) One-tenth of the reserved credit amount stated in the notice issued under division (B) of this section. (E) Each eligibility certificate shall state the annual credit amount, the years that comprise the credit period, the name, address, and taxpayer identification number of each project owner, each owner's designated reporter, the date the certificate is issued, a unique identifying number, and any additional information prescribed by a rule adopted under division (H) of this section. A project owner, if the project owner is a pass-through entity, shall provide a copy of the eligibility certificate and any information described in division (I) of this section to each equity owner that has been allocated a credit under division (F)(2) of this section, if requested. (F)(1) For each year of a qualified project's credit period, the project owner or an equity owner may claim a nonrefundable credit against the tax imposed by section 5725.18, 5726.02, 5729.03, 5729.06, or 5747.02 of the Revised Code equal to all or a portion of the annual credit amount stated on the eligibility certificate. The credit shall be claimed in the manner prescribed by section 5725.36, 5726.58, 5729.19, or 5747.83 of the Revised Code, as applicable. (2) If a project owner is a pass-through entity, the annual credit amount for any year of a qualified project's credit period may be allocated by the project owner among one or more equity owners and may be applied by those equity owners against more than one tax, but the total credits claimed in connection with that year of the qualified project's credit period by all project owners and equity owners against all taxes shall not exceed the annual credit amount stated on the eligibility certificate. If any equity owner is an area agency on aging, as defined in section 173.14 of the Revised Code, no interest in tax credits may be allocated to an equity owner unless that equity owner has provided consideration to the project owner in an amount that is at least seventy-five per cent of the credit amount allocated. (3) A project owner or equity owner may claim the credit authorized by this section after the date the qualified project is placed into service but not before the director issues the project owner an eligibility certificate under division (D) of this section and the applicable report required by division (I) of this section is filed by the designated reporter. (4) A project owner or equity owner that claims a tax credit under division (F)(1) of this section shall submit a copy of the eligibility certificate with the project owner's or equity owner's tax return or report. Upon request of the tax commissioner or the superintendent of insurance, any project owner or equity owner claiming a tax credit under this section shall provide the commissioner or superintendent other documentation that may be necessary to verify that the project owner or equity owner is entitled to claim the credit. (5) A project owner that is a pass-through entity may allocate the credit authorized by this section to its equity owners under division (F)(2) of this section in any manner agreed to by such persons regardless of whether such equity owners are eligible for an allocation of the federal credit, whether the allocation of the credit under the terms of the agreement has substantial economic effect within the meaning of section 704(b) of the Internal Revenue Code, and whether any such person is deemed a partner of the project owner or equity owner for federal income tax purposes as long as the equity owner acquired its ownership interest prior to claiming the credit. The allocation shall be allowed without regard to any provision of the Internal Revenue Code, or regulation promulgated pursuant to it, that may be interpreted as contrary to the allocation, including, without limitation, the treatment of the allocation as a disguised sale. An equity owner may assign all or any part of its interest in a qualified project, including its interest in the tax credits authorized by this section, to one or more other equity owners, and each assignee shall be able to claim the credit so long as its interest is acquired prior to the filing of its tax return or report or amended tax return or report claiming the credit and the assignee's ownership interest is identified in the report required by division (I) of this section. An equity owner that is an area agency on aging, as defined in section 173.14 of the Revised Code, may not assign an interest in tax credits authorized by this section unless the area agency on aging has received consideration from the transferee in an amount that is at least seventy-five per cent of the credit amount assigned. (6) Nothing in this section or section 5725.36, 5726.58, 5729.19, or 5747.83 of the Revised Code allows the assignment or transfer of any carryforward of the credit authorized under this section once the annual credit amount is claimed. (G) If any portion of the federal credit allocated to a qualified project is recaptured under section 42(j) of the Internal Revenue Code or is otherwise disallowed, the director shall recapture a proportionate amount of the tax credit claimed pursuant to this section in connection with the same qualified project. If the director determines to recapture such a tax credit, the director shall certify the name of each project owner and the amount to be recaptured to the tax commissioner and to the superintendent of insurance. The commissioner or superintendent shall determine the taxpayer or taxpayers that claimed the credit, the tax against which the credit was claimed, and the amount to be recaptured and make an assessment against the taxpayer or taxpayers under Chapter 5725., 5726., 5729., or 5747. of the Revised Code, as applicable, for the amount of the tax credit to be recaptured. The time limitations on assessments under those chapters do not bar an assessment made under this division. (H) The director, in consultation with the tax commissioner and superintendent of insurance, shall adopt any rules necessary to implement this section in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code. (I)(1) For each calendar year, a designated reporter shall provide the tax commissioner, in the form prescribed by the tax commissioner in consultation with the superintendent of insurance, all of the following: (a) The name, address, and taxpayer identification number of each project owner and equity owner that has been allocated a portion of the annual credit awarded on the eligibility certificate for that year; (b) The amount of the annual credit allocated to each such project owner and equity owner for such year and the tax against which the credit will be claimed; (c) The total of the amounts listed for each project owner and equity owner under division (I)(1)(b) of this section, demonstrating that the total does not exceed the amount listed on the eligibility certificate for that year. (2) A designated reporter shall notify the tax commissioner of any changes to the information reported in division (I)(1) of this section in the time and manner prescribed by the commissioner. (3) No credit allocated under this section may be claimed by a project owner or equity owner for a year unless that owner and the amount of the credit allocated to that owner appear on the report required by division (I)(1) of this section for that year. The tax commissioner shall provide a copy of the report, and any subsequent changes to the report, submitted by the designated reporter under division (I) of this section to the superintendent of insurance in the time and manner agreed to by the commissioner and superintendent. Section 2. That existing sections 149.311 and 175.16 of the Revised Code are hereby repealed.